ko: 활성화 방법: 자동 충전; 첫 사용 시 자동; 고객 서비스 통화; 전화 접속 PIN; 매장 내 활성화; 모바일 앱; 온라인 포털; QR 코드 스캔; SIM 툴킷 메뉴; 스크래치 오프 PIN; USSD 코드; 바우처 또는 PIN 입력; 기타
nl: Activeringsmethode: Automatisch opwaarderen; Automatisch bij het eerste gebruik; Klantenservicegesprek; Inbel-PIN; Activering in de winkel; Mobiele app; Online portaal; QR-code scan; SIM-toolkitmenu; Kras-PIN; USSD-code; Voucher of pincode-invoer; Andere
ru: Система активации: Автоматически при пополнении; Автоматически при первом использовании; Звонок в службу поддержки клиентов; Звонок с вводом PIN-кода; Активация в магазине; Мобильное приложение; Интернет-портал; Сканирование QR-кода; Меню SIM-карты; PIN-код под скретч-слоем; USSD-команда; Ваучер или PIN-код; Другое
th: วิธีการเปิดใช้งาน: เติมเงินอัตโนมัติ; อัตโนมัติเมื่อใช้งานครั้งแรก; การโทรติดต่อฝ่ายบริการลูกค้า; รหัส PIN สำหรับโทรเข้า; การเปิดใช้งานในร้านค้า; แอปมือถือ; พอร์ทัลออนไลน์; การสแกนคิวอาร์โค้ด; เมนูชุดเครื่องมือ SIM; ขูดรหัส PIN; รหัส USSD; การป้อนบัตรกำนัลหรือรหัส PIN; อื่นๆ
it: Metodo di attivazione: Ricarica automatica; Automatico al primo utilizzo; Chiamata al servizio clienti; PIN di accesso; Attivazione in negozio; Applicazione mobile; Portale online; Scansione del codice QR; Menu del toolkit SIM; PIN grattabile; Codice USSD; Inserimento voucher o PIN; Altro
tr: Aktivasyon yöntemi: Otomatik Yükleme; İlk kullanımda otomatik; Müşteri hizmetleri çağrısı; Tuşlama PIN'i; Mağazada aktivasyon; Mobil uygulama; Online portal; QR kod taraması; SIM araç seti menüsü; Kazımalı PIN; USSD kodu; Kupon veya PIN girişi; Diğer
hr-HR: Metoda aktivacije: Automatsko nadopunjavanje; Automatski pri prvoj upotrebi; Poziv korisničke službe; PIN za uključivanje; Aktivacija u trgovini; Mobilna aplikacija; Mrežni portal; Skeniranje QR koda; Izbornik SIM alata; PIN za struganje; USSD kod; Unos vaučera ili PIN-a; Ostalo
pt-PT: Método de ativação: Carregamento automático; Automático na primeira utilização; Chamada de serviço ao cliente; PIN de acesso; Ativação na loja; Aplicação para dispositivos móveis; Portal online; Leitura de código QR; Menu do kit de ferramentas SIM; PIN para raspar; Código USSD; Introdução do voucher ou PIN; Outro
pt-BR: Método de ativação: Recarga automática; Automático no primeiro uso; Chamada de atendimento ao cliente; PIN de discagem; Ativação na loja; Aplicativo móvel; Portal online; Leitura de código QR; Menu do kit de ferramentas SIM; PIN raspável; Código USSD; Entrada de voucher ou PIN; Outro
ja: アクティブ化の方法: 自動チャージ; 初回使用時に自動; カスタマーサービスコール; ダイヤルインPIN; 店頭アクティベーション; モバイルアプリ; オンラインポータル; QRコードスキャン; SIMツールキットメニュー; スクラッチ式PIN; USSDコード; バウチャーまたはPIN入力; その他
es: Método de activación: Recarga automática; Automático en el primer uso; Llamada de servicio al cliente; PIN de acceso telefónico; Activación en tienda; Aplicación móvil; Portal online; Escaneo de código QR; Menú del kit de herramientas SIM; PIN para raspar; Código USSD; Entrada de cupón o PIN; Otros
fr: Méthode d’activation: Recharge automatique; Automatique à la première utilisation; Appel au service client; Code PIN d'accès; Activation en boutique; Application mobile; Portail en ligne; Lecture du code QR; Menu de la boîte à outils SIM; Code PIN à gratter; Code USSD; Saisie du bon ou du code PIN; Autre
el: Μέθοδος ενεργοποίησης: Αυτόματη ανανέωση υπολοίπου; Αυτόματη κατά την πρώτη χρήση; Κλήση στην εξυπηρέτηση πελατών; PIN για σύνδεση σε κλήση; Ενεργοποίηση εντός καταστήματος; Εφαρμογή για κινητά; Ηλεκτρονική πύλη; Σάρωση κωδικού QR; Μενού κιτ εργαλείων SIM; Ξυστό PIN; Κωδικός USSD; Εισαγωγή κουπονιού ή PIN; Άλλο
da: Aktiveringsmetode: Automatisk optankning; Automatisk ved første brug; Kundeserviceopkald; Opkalds-PIN; Aktivering i butikken; Mobilapp; Onlineportal; QR-kodescanning; SIM-værktøjssætmenu; Skrabekode; USSD-kode; Indtastning af kupon- eller pinkode; Andet
ro-RO: Metodă de activare: Reîncărcare automată; Automat la prima utilizare; Apel la serviciul clienți; PIN de apelare; Activare în magazin; Aplicație mobilă; Portal online; Scanare cod QR; Meniul setului de instrumente SIM; PIN răzuibil; Cod USSD; Introducere voucher sau PIN; Altele
cs: Způsob aktivace: Automatické dobíjení; Automaticky při prvním použití; Volání zákaznického servisu; PIN kód; Aktivace v obchodě; Mobilní aplikace; Online portál; Naskenování QR kódu; Nabídka nástrojů SIM; Stírací PIN; USSD kód; Zadání poukazu nebo PINu; Jiné
hu: Aktiválási módszer: Automatikus feltöltés; Automatikus az első használatkor; Ügyfélszolgálati hívás; Belépési PIN-kód; Üzletben történő aktiválás; Mobilalkalmazás; Online portál; QR-kód beolvasása; SIM eszközkészlet menü; Lekaparható PIN-kód; USSD-kód; Utalvány vagy PIN-kód megadása; Egyéb
bg-BG: Метод на активиране: Автоматично допълване; Автоматично при първа употреба; Обаждане за обслужване на клиенти; ПИН код за набиране; Активиране в магазина; Мобилно приложение; Онлайн портал; Сканиране на QR код; Меню с инструменти за SIM карта; ПИН код с изтриване; USSD код; Въвеждане на ваучер или ПИН код; Други
en: Activation method: Automatic Top-Up; Automatic on first use; Customer service call; Dial-In PIN; In-store activation; Mobile app; Online portal; QR code scan; SIM toolkit menu; Scratch-Off PIN; USSD code; Voucher or PIN entry; Other
lt-LT: Aktyvinimo principas: Automatinis papildymas; Automatiškai pirmą kartą panaudojus; Klientų aptarnavimo skambutis; Įvedamas PIN; Aktyvinimas parduotuvėje; Mobilioji programėlė; Internetinis portalas; QR kodo nuskaitymas; SIM įrankių rinkinio meniu; Nutrinamas PIN kodas; USSD kodas; Kupono arba PIN kodo įvedimas; Kita
zh-CN: 激活方法: 自动充值激活; 首次使用时自动激活; 客服电话激活; 拨号输入 PIN 码激活; 门店激活; 手机应用激活; 在线门户激活; 扫描二维码激活; SIM 工具包菜单激活; 刮卡输入 PIN 码激活; USSD 代码激活; 输入凭证或 PIN 码激活; 其他
zh-TW: 啟用方式: 自動儲值; 首次使用時設為自動; 顧客服務電話; 撥入 PIN 碼; 店內啟用; 行動應用程式; 線上入口網站; QR 碼掃描; SIM 工具包選單; 刮刮樂 PIN 碼; USSD 代碼; 兌換券或 PIN 碼輸入; 其他
fi: Aktivointitapa: Automaattinen täyteen lataus; Automaattisesti ensimmäisellä käyttökerralla; Asiakaspalvelupuhelu; Puhelinneuvottelun PIN-koodi; Aktivointi myymälässä; Mobiilisovellus; Verkkoportaali; QR-koodin skannaus; SIM-työkaluvalikko; Raaputettava PIN-koodi; USSD-koodi; Alennuskoodin tai PIN-koodin syöttö; Muu
vi: Phương pháp kích hoạt: Nạp tiền tự động; Tự động khi sử dụng lần đầu; Cuộc gọi dịch vụ khách hàng; Mã PIN quay số; Kích hoạt tại cửa hàng; Ứng dụng di động; Cổng thông tin trực tuyến; Quét mã QR; Menu bộ công cụ SIM; Mã PIN cào; Mã USSD; Nhập mã PIN hoặc phiếu giảm giá; Khác
sk-SK: Metóda aktivácie: Automatické dobitie; Automaticky pri prvom použití; Hovor na zákaznícku linku; Zadanie PIN kódu cez hovor; Aktivácia v predajni; Mobilná aplikácia; Online portál; Skenovanie QR kódu; Menu nástrojov SIM; PIN kód pod ochrannou vrstvou; USSD kód; Zadanie poukazu alebo PIN kódu; Iné
nb: Aktiveringsmetode: Automatisk påfylling; Automatisk ved første gangs bruk; Kundeservicesamtale; PIN-kode for innringing; Aktivering i butikk; Mobilapp; Nettportal; Skanning av QR-kode; Meny for SIM-verktøysett; Skrapekode; USSD-kode; Kupong- eller PIN-inntasting; Annet
pl: Metoda aktywacji: Automatyczne doładowanie; Automatycznie przy pierwszym użyciu; Połączenie z działem obsługi klienta; Numer PIN do wybierania numeru; Aktywacja w sklepie; Aplikacja mobilna; Portal internetowy; Skanowanie kodu QR; Menu zestawu narzędzi SIM; Kod PIN w formie zdrapki; Kod USSD; Wprowadzenie kodu vouchera lub kodu PIN; Inne
de: Aktivierungsmethode: Automatisches Aufladen; Automatisch bei der ersten Verwendung; Anruf beim Kundenservice; Einwahl-PIN; Aktivierung im Geschäft; Mobile App; Online-Portal; QR-Code-Scan; SIM-Toolkit-Menü; Rubbel-PIN; USSD-Code; Gutschein- oder PIN-Eingabe; Sonstiges
sv: Aktiveringsmetod: Automatisk påfyllning; Automatisk vid första användningen; Kundtjänstsamtal; PIN-kod för inringning; Aktivering i butik; Mobilapp; Onlineportal; QR-kodsskanning; SIM-verktygssatsmeny; Skrapbar PIN-kod; USSD-kod; Kupong- eller PIN-inmatning; Övrigt
sl-SI: Metoda aktivacije: Samodejno polnjenje; Samodejno ob prvi uporabi; Klic službi za pomoč uporabnikom; Vnos PIN-kode prek klica; Aktivacija v trgovini; Mobilna aplikacija; Spletni portal; Skeniranje QR-kode; Meni orodij SIM; PIN-koda pod zaščitno plastjo; USSD-koda; Vnos kupona ali PIN-kode; Drugo